Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202048-632
Claims; determination; notice; persons entitled; employer; rights; duties.

(1) Notice of a determination upon a claim shall be promptly given to the claimant by electronic notice or by mailing such notice to his or her last-known address. A claimant shall elect to receive either electronic notice or mailed notice when he or she files a new claim or establishes a new benefit year. A claimant may change his or her election at any time. In addition, notice of any determination, together with the reasons therefor, shall be promptly given in the same manner to any employer from whom the claimant received wages on or after the first day of the base period for his or her most recent claim if such employer has indicated prior to the determination, in such manner as required by rule and regulation of the commissioner, that such individual may be ineligible or disqualified under any provision of the Employment Security Law. An employer shall provide information to the department in respect to the request for information within ten days after the mailing or electronic transmission of a request.

(2) If the employer provided information pursuant to subsection (6) of section 48-652 on the claim establishing the previous benefit year but did not receive a determination because of no involvement of base period wages and there are wages from that employer in the base period for the most recent claim, the employer shall be provided the opportunity to provide new information that such individual may be ineligible or disqualified under any provision of the Employment Security Law on the current claim. This subsection shall not apply to employers who did not receive a determination because the separation was determined to result from a lack of work.

(3) If an employer fails to provide information to the department within the time period specified in subsection (1) of this section, the employer shall forfeit any appeal rights otherwise available pursuant to section 48-634.

Laws 1941, c. 94, § 4, p. 385;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-706;

R.S.1943, § 48-632;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 25;

Laws 2012, LB1058, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB172, § 52;

Laws 2017, LB203, § 4.